Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
In General
[Repealed]

§§ 19-21-1 through 19-21-35.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1986, ch. 459, § 44, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§19-21-1. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 29, art 3 (1); 1857, ch. 6, art 138; 1871, § 244; 1880, § 350; 1892, § 815; 1906, § 880; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4047; 1930, § 638; 1942, § 3893]

§19-21-3. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 29, art 3 (15); 1857, ch. 6, art 151; 1871, § 257; 1880, § 363; 1892, § 828; 1906, § 893; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4060; 1930, § 651; 1942, § 3906; Laws, 1938, ch. 296]

§19-21-5. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 29, art 3 (17); 1857, ch. 6, art 153; 1871, § 259; 1880, § 365; 1892, § 830; 1906, § 895; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4062; 1930, § 653; 1942, § 3908; Laws, 1950, ch. 345]

§19-21-7. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 29, art 3 (19); 1857, ch. 6, art 154; 1871, § 260; 1880, § 366; 1892, § 831; 1906, § 896; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4063; 1930, § 654; 1942, § 3909]

§19-21-9. [Codes, 1857, ch. 6, art 152; 1871, § 258; 1880, § 364; 1892, § 829; 1906, § 894; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4061; 1930, § 652; 1942, § 3907]

§19-21-11. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 29, art 3 (3); 1857, ch. 6, art 139; 1871, § 245; 1880, § 351; 1892, § 816; 1906, § 881; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4048; 1930, § 639; 1942, § 3894; Laws, 1894, ch. 60; Laws, 1956, ch. 250]

§19-21-13. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 29, art 3 (4); 1857, ch. 6, art 140; 1871, § 246; 1880, § 352; 1892, § 817; 1906, § 882; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4049; 1930, § 640; 1942, § 3895]

§19-21-15. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 29, art 3 (8); 1857, ch. 6, art 141; 1871, § 247; 1880, § 353; 1892, § 818; 1906, § 883; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4050; 1930, § 641; 1942, § 3896]

§19-21-17. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 29, art 3 (6); 1857, ch. 6, art 142; 1871, § 248; 1880, § 354; 1892, § 819; 1906, § 884; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4051; 1930, § 642; 1942, § 3897]

§19-21-19. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 29, art 3 (5); 1857, ch. 6, art 143; 1871, § 249; 1880, § 355; 1892, § 820; 1906, § 885; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4052; 1930, § 643; 1942, § 3898]

§19-21-21. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 29, art 3 (7); 1857, ch. 6, art 144; 1871, § 250; 1880, § 356; 1892, § 821; 1906, § 886; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4053; 1930, § 644; 1942, § 3899]

§19-21-23. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 29, art 3 (9); 1857, ch. 6, art 145; 1871, § 251; 1880, § 357; 1892, § 822; 1906, § 887; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4054; 1930, § 645; 1942, § 3900]

§19-21-25. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 29, art 3 (10); 1857, ch. 6, art 146; 1871, § 252; 1880, § 358; 1892, § 823; 1906, § 888; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4055; 1930, § 646; 1942, § 3901]

§19-21-27. [Codes, 1857, ch. 6, art 148; 1871, § 254; 1880, § 360; 1892, § 825; 1906, § 890; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4057; 1930, § 648; 1942, § 3903]

§19-21-29. [Codes, 1857, ch. 6, art 147; 1871, § 253; 1880, § 359; 1892, § 824; 1906, § 889; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4056; 1930, § 647; 1942, § 3902; Laws, 1950, ch. 324; Laws, 1970, ch. 412, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1970) ]

§19-21-31. [Codes, 1857, ch. 6, art 149; 1871, § 255; 1880, § 361; 1892, § 826; 1906, § 891; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4058; 1930, § 649; 1942, § 3904]

§19-21-33. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 29, art 4; 1857, ch. 6, art 150; 1871, § 256; 1880, § 362; 1892, § 827; 1906, § 892; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4059; 1930, § 650; 1942, § 3905]

§19-21-35. [En Laws, 1977, ch. 369]